Indiana, session 2026, HB1278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-23-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2023,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. At any time there is a vacancy or expiration of
a term, the Indiana State Nurses Association shall recommend to the
governor a list of qualified nurses for appointment to the board in the
number of not less than twice the number of:
(1) nurse vacancies to be filled; or
(2) nurse appointments to be made.
SECTION 2. IC 25-23-1-20.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2023,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.1. (a) As used in this section, "eligible
associate or bachelor's degree registered nursing program" means an a
practical nursing program or an associate or bachelor's degree
registered nursing program that:
(1) is accredited by the board; and
(2) has an annual rate of successful completion of the National
Council Licensure Examination (NCLEX) score of at least eighty
percent (80%).
(b) As used in this section, "nursing program" means any of the
following:
(1) A licensed practical nursing program.
(2) An associate degree nursing program.
HEA 1278

2
(3) A diploma nursing program.
(4) A baccalaureate degree nursing program.
(c) An eligible associate degree or bachelor's degree registered
nursing program that has been operating for at least five (5) years may
increase enrollment in the program at any rate the program considers
appropriate. An institution that has been operating an eligible
nursing program for at least five (5) years may increase the
enrollment in any eligible nursing program at any rate the
institution considers appropriate.
(d) A nursing program that:
(1) is operated by a postsecondary educational institution, as
defined in IC 21-7-13-6(a)(1);
(2) was accredited by the board on a date after June 30, 2020; and
(3) has been operating for at least one (1) year;
may increase its enrollment rate by not more than one hundred percent
(100%).
HEA 1278

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1278